Arkansas, session 2025, HB1258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:
CHAPTER 46

COMMUNITY HEALTH WORKER ACT

Subchapter 1 - General Provisions

17-46-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Community Health
Worker Act”.

17-46-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Community health worker" means an individual who is a
*JMB037*
03-18-2025 14:06:30 JMB037

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 S3/18/25 HB1258
trusted member of or has an unusually close understanding of the community
that he or she is serving as a liaison, link, or intermediary between health
services or social services and the community to facilitate access to health
services or social services and to improve the quality and cultural
competence of the services delivered;
(2) “Health benefit plan” means an individual, blanket, or any
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services issued or delivered
in this state by a healthcare insurer, health maintenance organization,
hospital medical service corporation, or self-insured governmental or church
plan in this state;
(3) "Healthcare professional" means a person who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer
health care in the ordinary course of the practice of his or her profession;
and
(4) "Healthcare provider" means:
(A) A hospital;
(B) An ambulatory surgical center;
(C) A primary care center;
(D) An outpatient psychiatric center;
(E) A home healthcare agency;
(F) A skilled nursing facility; or
(G) An individual licensed to render covered healthcare
services.

Subchapter 2 - Certifications

17-46-201. Community health worker — Certification.
(a) The Department of Health shall issue a certification to be a
community health worker to an individual who:
(1) Is eighteen (18) years of age or older;
(2) Meets one (1) of the following requirements:
(A) He or she is certified as a community health worker by
the Arkansas Community Health Worker Association;
(B) He or she has worked as a community health worker for
two (2) years with one (1) in this state and successfully completes a
community health worker training program consisting of one hundred twenty
03-18-2025 14:06:30 JMB037

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 S3/18/25 HB1258
(120) hours of core competency, including eighty (80) hours of didactic
training and forty (40) hours of guided field practice from a school or
training program approved by the Arkansas Community Health Worker Association
in consultation with the department;
(C) He or she has worked as a community health worker for
one (1) year within this state and has met the following requirements as
outlined by the Arkansas Community Health Worker Association:
(i) Successfully completed eighty (80) hours of
supplemental training that supports core competency and professional
development;
(ii) Been assigned a mentor who is a certified
community health worker in this state or is eligible for certification and
regularly accessed and communicated with the mentor at least two (2) times
per month during the first three (3) months of the mentorship and monthly
thereafter; and
(iii) Been assigned a supervisor who has completed
community health worker supervisor training and regularly accessed and
communicated with the supervisor at least two (2) times per week during the
first three (3) months of supervision and weekly for the remainder of the
year; or
(D) He or she has four (4) years of experience that
provides evidence of proficiency in the core competencies, with two (2) years
of experience being in this state; and
(3) Submits an application with an application fee of fifty
dollars ($50.00).
(c)(1) A certification is valid for two (2) years after the date of
issuance.
(2) To renew a certification, a community health worker shall:
(A) Complete twenty (20) hours of professional
developmental and training related to core competencies of a community health
worker within the two-year period; and
(B) Submit a renewal application with a renewal
application fee as determined by the department, in consultation with the
Arkansas Community Health Worker Association.
(d) The Arkansas Community Health Worker Association, in conjunction
with the Division of Higher Education, shall create and maintain a registry
03-18-2025 14:06:30 JMB037

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 S3/18/25 HB1258
of approved community health worker training programs to be made available to
the public.

17-46-202. Suspension, revocation, nonissuance, or nonrenewal.
(a) The Department of Health may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue
or renew the certification of a community health worker for:
(1) Securing a certification under this chapter through fraud or
deceit;
(2) Unethical conduct, gross ignorance, or inefficiency in the
conduct of his or her practice;
(3) Using a false name or an alias in his or her practice;
(4) Violating any provision of this chapter; or
(5) Failing to comply with any of the requirements for issuance
of the certification.
(b) Proceedings under this section shall comply with the Arkansas
Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

Subchapter 3 - Miscellaneous Provisions

17-46-301. Scope of practice.
A community health worker shall perform only the following types of
services:
(1) Providing:
(A) Cultural mediation among individuals, communities, and
health service systems or social services systems, or both;
(B) Culturally appropriate health education and
information;
(C) Care coordination, including without limitation
medication compliance under a patient care plan as directed by a healthcare
provider or healthcare professional;
(D) Case management;
(E) Health service system navigation or social services
system navigation, or both;
(F) Coaching and social support; and
(G) Direct services that:
(i) In order to be performed, do not require a
03-18-2025 14:06:30 JMB037

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 S3/18/25 HB1258
professional license under subtitle 3 of this title or specialized training
under § 20-77-2301 et seq., such as first aid and diabetic foot checks; or
(ii) Are not met by a personal care attendant;
(2) Advocating for individuals and communities;
(3) Building individual and community capacity;
(4) Implementing individual and community assessments, including
without limitation:
(A) Basic home environmental assessments; and
(B) Basic health screening and tests;
(5) Conducting outreach, such as health literacy services; and
(6) Participating in evaluation and research, including without
limitation health education and community research activities.

17-46-302. Patient and personal data and information.
(a) Patient and personal data and information accessed or attained by
a community health worker is exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., and is confidential and
privileged as otherwise required by federal law.
(b) If a community health worker does not maintain the confidential
and privileged nature of the patient data or information, the community
health worker shall be subject to any penalty under state and federal law for
a breach of confidential patient data or information.

17-46-303. Community health worker compensation.
A community health worker certified under this chapter shall receive
compensation for services provided from:
(1) The Arkansas Medicaid Program; or
(2) A health benefit plan.

17-46-304. Rules.
The Department of Health may promulgate rules relating to the
certification and regulation of community health workers under this
subchapter.

/s/L. Johnson

03-18-2025 14:06:30 JMB037